Utah statutes.
17B-1-309.   Board officers -- Term.

(1) (a)  The board of trustees shall elect from their number a chair and may elect other officers as the board considers appropriate.

(b)  The offices of treasurer and clerk may not be held by the same person.

(2)  Each officer serves at the pleasure of the board of trustees, but the board may designate a set term for officers.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

